Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (n) of Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in
place thereof
the following two sentences:-
Enrollment in a commonwealth charter school shall use an opt-out admissions lottery
process that automatically includes the names of all eligible students, without any required
application process for the school. A commonwealth charter school’s tuition payment shall be
adjusted to account for any students who cannot attend said school because necessary services
are not available.
of 1